Connecticut, session 2026, SB00280.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Subdivision (1) of subsection (b) of section 27-102l of the
2026 supplement to the general statutes is repealed and the following is
substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(b) (1) The commissioner may appoint a manager to administer an
Office of Advocacy and Assistance for the aid and benefit of veterans
and their spouses, eligible dependents and family members. The office
shall have a staff of not [less] fewer than nineteen men and women,
including not [less] fewer than fourteen veterans' service officers, and
not [less] fewer than three clerical personnel. The manager and veterans'
service officers shall be veterans, as defined in subsection (a) of section
27-103, or veterans who were awarded the armed forces expeditionary
medal for service by the armed forces.
Sec. 2. Subsection (c) of section 14-21cc of the 2026 supplement to the
LCO No. 1548 1 of 2

Raised Bill No. 280
general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(c) There is established the "Hispanic-American Veterans of
Connecticut" commemorative account which shall be a separate,
nonlapsing account. [within the General Fund.] The account shall
contain any moneys required by law to be deposited in the account. The
funds in said account shall be used by Hispanic-American Veterans of
Connecticut, Inc. to provide bilingual services and assistance to
Connecticut veterans and members of the armed forces. Hispanic-
American Veterans of Connecticut, Inc. may receive private donations
to said account and any such donations shall be deposited in said
account.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 27-102l(b)(1)
Sec. 2 October 1, 2026 14-21cc(c)